Illinois, session 104th, HB5118.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Natural Resources 5(Conservation) Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 6Illinois is amended by changing Sections 805-70 and 805-420 as 7follows: 8    (20 ILCS 805/805-70)  (was 20 ILCS 805/63b2.9)9    Sec. 805-70. Grants and contracts. 10    (a) The Department has the power to accept, receive, 11expend, and administer, including by grant, agreement, or 12contract, those funds that are made available to the 13Department from the federal government and other public and 14private sources in the exercise of its statutory powers and 15duties.16    (b) The Department may make grants to other State 17agencies, universities, not-for-profit organizations, and 18local governments, pursuant to an appropriation in the 19exercise of its statutory powers and duties.20    (c) With the exception of Open Space Lands Acquisition and 21Development and Land and Water Conservation Fund grants, the 22Department may assess review and processing fees for grant 23program applications under the jurisdiction of the Department.   HB5118 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1The Department may, by rule, regulate the fees, methods, and 2programs to be charged. The income collected shall be 3deposited into the Park and Conservation Fund to be used by for 4the furtherance of the Department as provided for in Section 5805-420 grant programs or for use by the Department for the 6ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department.7    Except as otherwise provided, all revenue collected from 8the application fee for the State Migratory Waterfowl Stamp 9Fund shall be deposited into the State Migratory Waterfowl 10Stamp Fund. 11    Except as otherwise provided, all revenue collected from 12the application fee for the State Pheasant Fund shall be 13deposited into the State Pheasant Fund. 14    Except as otherwise provided, all revenue collected from 15the application fee for the Illinois Habitat Fund shall be 16deposited into the Illinois Habitat Fund. 17    Except as otherwise provided, all revenue collected from 18the application fee for the State Furbearer Fund shall be 19deposited into the State Furbearer Fund. 20    The monies deposited into the Park and Conservation Fund, 21the State Migratory Waterfowl Stamp Fund, the State Pheasant 22Fund, the Illinois Habitat Fund, and the State Furbearer Fund 23under this Section shall not be subject to administrative 24charges or chargebacks unless otherwise authorized by this 25Act. 26(Source: P.A. 97-1136, eff. 1-1-13.)   HB5118 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1    (20 ILCS 805/805-420)  (was 20 ILCS 805/63a36)2    Sec. 805-420. Appropriations from Park and Conservation 3Fund. The Department has the power to expend monies 4appropriated to the Department from the Park and Conservation 5Fund in the State treasury for the furtherance of the 6Department's programs or for use by the Department for the 7Department's normal operations and for the construction and 8maintenance of State owned, leased, and managed sites 9conservation and park purposes.10    Eighty percent of the revenue derived from fees paid for 11certificates of title, duplicate certificates of title and 12corrected certificates of title and deposited in the Park and 13Conservation Fund, as provided for in Section 2-119 of the 14Illinois Vehicle Code, shall be expended solely by the 15Department pursuant to an appropriation for acquisition, 16development, and maintenance of bike paths, including grants 17for the acquisition and development of bike paths and 20% of 18the revenue derived from fees shall be deposited into the 19Illinois Fisheries Management Fund, a special fund created in 20the State Treasury to be used for the operation of the Division 21of Fisheries within the Department. 22    Revenue derived from fees paid for the registration of 23motor vehicles of the first division and deposited in the Park 24and Conservation Fund, as provided for in Section 3-806 of the 25Illinois Vehicle Code, shall be expended by the Department for   HB5118 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1the following purposes:2        (A) Fifty percent of funds derived from the vehicle 3    registration fee shall be used by the Department for 4    normal operations. 5        (B) Fifty percent of funds derived from the vehicle 6    registration fee shall be used by the Department for 7    construction and maintenance of State owned, leased, and 8    managed sites. 9    The monies deposited into the Park and Conservation Fund 10and the Illinois Fisheries Management Fund under this Section 11shall not be subject to administrative charges or chargebacks 12unless otherwise authorized by this Act. 13(Source: P.A. 97-1136, eff. 1-1-13.) 14    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 15Section 8.25 as follows: 16    (30 ILCS 105/8.25)  (from Ch. 127, par. 144.25)17    Sec. 8.25. Build Illinois Fund; uses. 18    (A) All moneys in the Build Illinois Fund shall be 19transferred, appropriated, and used only for the purposes 20authorized by and subject to the limitations and conditions 21prescribed by this Section. There are established the 22following accounts in the Build Illinois Fund: the McCormick 23Place Account, the Build Illinois Bond Account, the Build 24Illinois Purposes Account, the Park and Conservation Fund   HB5118 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1Account, and the Tourism Advertising and Promotion Account. 2Amounts deposited into the Build Illinois Fund consisting of 31.55% before July 1, 1986, and 1.75% on and after July 1, 1986, 4of moneys received by the Department of Revenue under Section 59 of the Use Tax Act, Section 9 of the Service Use Tax Act, 6Section 9 of the Service Occupation Tax Act, and Section 3 of 7the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, and all amounts deposited 8therein under Section 28 of the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 91975, Section 4.05 of the Chicago World's Fair - 1992 10Authority Act, and Sections 3 and 6 of the Hotel Operators' 11Occupation Tax Act, shall be credited initially to the 12McCormick Place Account and all other amounts deposited into 13the Build Illinois Fund shall be credited initially to the 14Build Illinois Bond Account. Of the amounts initially so 15credited to the McCormick Place Account in each month, the 16amount that is to be transferred in that month to the 17Metropolitan Fair and Exposition Authority Improvement Bond 18Fund, as provided below, shall remain credited to the 19McCormick Place Account, and all amounts initially so credited 20in that month in excess thereof shall next be credited to the 21Build Illinois Bond Account. Of the amounts credited to the 22Build Illinois Bond Account in each month, the amount that is 23to be transferred in that month to the Build Illinois Bond 24Retirement and Interest Fund, as provided below, shall remain 25credited to the Build Illinois Bond Account, and all amounts 26so credited in each month in excess thereof shall next be   HB5118 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1credited monthly to the other accounts in the following order 2of priority: first, to the Build Illinois Purposes Account, 3plus any cumulative deficiency in those transfers for prior 4months; second, 1/12 of $10,000,000, plus any cumulative 5deficiency in those transfers for prior months, to the Park 6and Conservation Fund Account; and third, to the General 7Revenue Fund in the State Treasury all amounts that remain in 8the Build Illinois Fund on the last day of each month and are 9not credited to any account in that Fund.10    Transfers from the McCormick Place Account in the Build 11Illinois Fund shall be made as follows:12    Beginning with fiscal year 1985 and continuing for each 13fiscal year thereafter, the Metropolitan Pier and Exposition 14Authority shall annually certify to the State Comptroller and 15State Treasurer the amount necessary and required during the 16fiscal year with respect to which the certification is made to 17pay the debt service requirements (including amounts to be 18paid with respect to arrangements to provide additional 19security or liquidity) on all outstanding bonds and notes, 20including refunding bonds (herein collectively referred to as 21bonds) of issues in the aggregate amount (excluding the amount 22of any refunding bonds issued by that Authority after January 231, 1986) of not more than $312,500,000 issued after July 1, 241984, by that Authority for the purposes specified in Sections 2510.1 and 13.1 of the Metropolitan Pier and Exposition 26Authority Act. In each month of the fiscal year in which there   HB5118 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1are bonds outstanding with respect to which the annual 2certification is made, the Comptroller shall order transferred 3and the Treasurer shall transfer from the McCormick Place 4Account in the Build Illinois Fund to the Metropolitan Fair 5and Exposition Authority Improvement Bond Fund an amount equal 6to 150% of the certified amount for that fiscal year divided by 7the number of months during that fiscal year in which bonds of 8the Authority are outstanding, plus any cumulative deficiency 9in those transfers for prior months; provided, that the 10maximum amount that may be so transferred in fiscal year 1985 11shall not exceed $15,000,000 or a lesser sum as is actually 12necessary and required to pay the debt service requirements 13for that fiscal year after giving effect to net operating 14revenues of that Authority available for that purpose as 15certified by that Authority, and provided further that the 16maximum amount that may be so transferred in fiscal year 1986 17shall not exceed $30,000,000 and in each fiscal year 18thereafter shall not exceed $33,500,000 in any fiscal year or 19a lesser sum as is actually necessary and required to pay the 20debt service requirements for that fiscal year after giving 21effect to net operating revenues of that Authority available 22for that purpose as certified by that Authority.23    When an amount equal to 100% of the aggregate amount of 24principal and interest in each fiscal year with respect to 25bonds issued after July 1, 1984, that by their terms are 26payable from the Metropolitan Fair and Exposition Authority   HB5118 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1Improvement Bond Fund, including under sinking fund 2requirements, has been so paid and deficiencies in reserves 3established from bond proceeds shall have been remedied, and 4at the time that those amounts have been transferred to the 5Authority as provided in Section 13.1 of the Metropolitan Pier 6and Exposition Authority Act, the remaining moneys, if any, 7deposited and to be deposited during each fiscal year to the 8Metropolitan Fair and Exposition Authority Improvement Bond 9Fund shall be transferred to the Metropolitan Fair and 10Exposition Authority Completion Note Subordinate Fund.11    Transfers from the Build Illinois Bond Account in the 12Build Illinois Fund shall be made as follows:13    Beginning with fiscal year 1986 and continuing for each 14fiscal year thereafter so long as limited obligation bonds of 15the State issued under the Build Illinois Bond Act remain 16outstanding, the Comptroller shall order transferred and the 17Treasurer shall transfer in each month, commencing in October, 181985, on the last day of that month, from the Build Illinois 19Bond Account to the Build Illinois Bond Retirement and 20Interest Fund in the State Treasury the amount required to be 21so transferred in that month under Section 13 of the Build 22Illinois Bond Act.23    As soon as may be practicable after the first day of each 24month beginning after July 1, 1984, the Comptroller shall 25order transferred and the Treasurer shall transfer from the 26Park and Conservation Fund Account in the Build Illinois Fund   HB5118 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1to the Park and Conservation Fund 1/12 of $10,000,000, plus 2any cumulative deficiency in those transfers for prior months, 3for any purpose conservation and park purposes as enumerated 4in Section 805-420 of the Department of Natural Resources 5(Conservation) Law (20 ILCS 805/805-420) or for the same 6purposes as specified in any other State general obligation 7bond Act enacted after November 1, 1984.8    All funds remaining in the Build Illinois Fund on the last 9day of any month and not credited to any account in that Fund 10shall be transferred by the State Treasurer to the General 11Revenue Fund.12    (B) For the purpose of this Section, "cumulative 13deficiency" shall include all deficiencies in those transfers 14that have occurred since July 1, 1984, as specified in 15subsection (A) of this Section.16    (C) (Blank).17    (D) (Blank).18(Source: P.A. 102-1071, eff. 6-10-22; 103-616, eff. 7-1-24.) 19    Section 15. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 20changing Sections 2-119, 3-806, and 3-815 as follows: 21    (625 ILCS 5/2-119)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 2-119)22    Sec. 2-119. Disposition of fees and taxes. 23    (a) All moneys received from Salvage Certificates shall be 24deposited in the Common School Fund in the State treasury.  HB5118 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1    (b) Of the money collected for each certificate of title, 2duplicate certificate of title, and corrected certificate of 3title:4        (1) $2.60 shall be deposited in the Park and 5    Conservation Fund;6        (2) $0.65 shall be deposited in the Illinois Fisheries 7    Management Fund;8        (3) $48 shall be disbursed under subsection (g) of 9    this Section;10        (4) $4 shall be deposited into the Motor Vehicle 11    License Plate Fund;12        (5) $30 shall be deposited into the Capital Projects 13    Fund; and14        (6) $10 shall be deposited into the Secretary of State 15    Special Services Fund. 16    All remaining moneys collected for certificates of title, 17and all moneys collected for filing of security interests, 18shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund.19    The $20 collected for each delinquent vehicle registration 20renewal fee shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund.21    The moneys deposited in the Park and Conservation Fund 22under this Section shall be used for the acquisition and 23development of bike paths as provided for in Section 805-420 24of the Department of Natural Resources (Conservation) Law of 25the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. The moneys 26deposited into the Park and Conservation Fund under this   HB5118 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1subsection shall not be subject to administrative charges or 2chargebacks, unless otherwise authorized by this Code.3    If the balance in the Motor Vehicle License Plate Fund 4exceeds $40,000,000 on the last day of a calendar month, then 5during the next calendar month, the $4 that otherwise would be 6deposited in that fund shall instead be deposited into the 7Road Fund. 8    (c) All moneys collected for that portion of a driver's 9license fee designated for driver education under Section 106-118 shall be placed in the Drivers Education Fund in the 11State treasury.12    (d) Of the moneys collected as a registration fee for each 13motorcycle, motor driven cycle, and moped, 27% shall be 14deposited in the Cycle Rider Safety Training Fund.15    (e) (Blank).16    (f) Of the total money collected for a commercial 17learner's permit (CLP) or original or renewal issuance of a 18commercial driver's license (CDL) pursuant to the Uniform 19Commercial Driver's License Act (UCDLA): (i) $6 of the total 20fee for an original or renewal CDL, and $6 of the total CLP fee 21when such permit is issued to any person holding a valid 22Illinois driver's license, shall be paid into the 23CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund and shall be used for the 24purposes provided in Section 6z-23 of the State Finance Act 25and (ii) $20 of the total fee for an original or renewal CDL or 26CLP shall be paid into the Motor Carrier Safety Inspection   HB5118 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1Fund, which is hereby created as a special fund in the State 2treasury, to be used by the Illinois State Police, subject to 3appropriation, to hire additional officers to conduct motor 4carrier safety inspections pursuant to Chapter 18b of this 5Code.6    (g) Of the moneys received by the Secretary of State as 7registration fees or taxes, certificates of title, duplicate 8certificates of title, corrected certificates of title, or as 9payment of any other fee under this Code, when those moneys are 10not otherwise distributed by this Code, 37% shall be deposited 11into the State Construction Account Fund, and 63% shall be 12deposited in the Road Fund. Moneys in the Road Fund shall be 13used for the purposes provided in Section 8.3 of the State 14Finance Act.15    (h) (Blank).16    (i) (Blank).17    (j) (Blank).18    (k) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 19to be known as the Secretary of State Special License Plate 20Fund. Money deposited into the Fund shall, subject to 21appropriation, be used by the Office of the Secretary of State 22(i) to help defray plate manufacturing and plate processing 23costs for the issuance and, when applicable, renewal of any 24new or existing registration plates authorized under this Code 25and (ii) for grants made by the Secretary of State to benefit 26Illinois Veterans Home libraries.  HB5118 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1    (l) The Motor Vehicle Review Board Fund is created as a 2special fund in the State treasury. Moneys deposited into the 3Fund under paragraph (7) of subsection (b) of Section 5-101 4and Section 5-109 shall, subject to appropriation, be used by 5the Office of the Secretary of State to administer the Motor 6Vehicle Review Board, including, without limitation, payment 7of compensation and all necessary expenses incurred in 8administering the Motor Vehicle Review Board under the Motor 9Vehicle Franchise Act.10    (m) Effective July 1, 1996, there is created in the State 11treasury a special fund to be known as the Family 12Responsibility Fund. Moneys deposited into the Fund shall, 13subject to appropriation, be used by the Office of the 14Secretary of State for the purpose of enforcing the Illinois 15Safety and Family Financial Responsibility Law.16    (n) The Illinois Fire Fighters' Memorial Fund is created 17as a special fund in the State treasury. Moneys deposited into 18the Fund shall, subject to appropriation, be used by the 19Office of the State Fire Marshal for construction of the 20Illinois Fire Fighters' Memorial to be located at the State 21Capitol grounds in Springfield, Illinois. Upon the completion 22of the Memorial, moneys in the Fund shall be used in accordance 23with Section 3-634.24    (o) Of the money collected for each certificate of title 25for all-terrain vehicles and off-highway motorcycles, $17 26shall be deposited into the Off-Highway Vehicle Trails Fund.  HB5118 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1    (p) For audits conducted on or after July 1, 2003 pursuant 2to Section 2-124(d) of this Code, 50% of the money collected as 3audit fees shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund.4    (q) Beginning July 1, 2023, the additional fees imposed by 5Public Act 103-8 in Sections 2-123, 3-821, and 6-118 shall be 6deposited into the Secretary of State Special Services Fund. 7(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 7-1-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 8104-435, eff. 11-21-25.) 9    (625 ILCS 5/3-806)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-806)10    Sec. 3-806. Registration Fees; Motor Vehicles of the First 11Division. Every owner of any other motor vehicle of the first 12division, except as provided in Sections 3-804, 3-804.01, 133-804.3, 3-805, 3-806.3, 3-806.7, and 3-808, and every second 14division vehicle weighing 8,000 pounds or less, shall pay the 15Secretary of State an annual registration fee at the following 16rates:  17SCHEDULE OF REGISTRATION FEES 18REQUIRED BY LAW 19Beginning with the 2021 registration year2021Annual Fee 22Motor vehicles of the first division other 23than Autocycles, Motorcycles, Motor 24Driven Cycles and Pedalcycles$148   HB5118 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b12Autocycles68 3 4Motorcycles, Motor Driven5Cycles and Pedalcycles 386    A $1 surcharge shall be collected in addition to the above 7fees for motor vehicles of the first division, autocycles, 8motorcycles, motor driven cycles, and pedalcycles to be 9deposited into the State Police Vehicle Fund. 10    All of the proceeds of the additional fees imposed by 11Public Act 96-34 shall be deposited into the Capital Projects 12Fund. 13    A $2 surcharge shall be collected in addition to the above 14fees for motor vehicles of the first division, autocycles, 15motorcycles, motor driven cycles, and pedalcycles to be 16deposited into the Park and Conservation Fund for the 17Department of Natural Resources to use as provided for in 18Section 805-420 of the Department of Natural Resources 19(Conservation) Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 20Illinois for conservation efforts. The monies deposited into 21the Park and Conservation Fund under this Section shall not be 22subject to administrative charges or chargebacks unless 23otherwise authorized by this Act.24    Of the fees collected for motor vehicles of the first 25division other than Autocycles, Motorcycles, Motor Driven 26Cycles, and Pedalcycles, $1 of the fees shall be deposited   HB5118 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1into the Secretary of State Special Services Fund and $49 of 2the fees shall be deposited into the Road Fund.3(Source: P.A. 101-32, eff. 6-28-19.) 4    (625 ILCS 5/3-815)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-815)5    Sec. 3-815. Flat weight tax; vehicles of the second 6division. 7    (a) Except as provided in Section 3-806.3 and 3-804.3, 8every owner of a vehicle of the second division registered 9under Section 3-813, and not registered under the mileage 10weight tax under Section 3-818, shall pay to the Secretary of 11State, for each registration year, for the use of the public 12highways, a flat weight tax at the rates set forth in the 13following table, the rates including the $10 registration fee:14SCHEDULE OF FLAT WEIGHT TAX15REQUIRED BY LAW16Gross Weight in Lbs.Total Fees17Including Vehicle each Fiscal18and Maximum LoadClass year198,000 lbs. and lessB$148208,001 lbs. to 10,000 lbs. C 218 2110,001 lbs. to 12,000 lbs.D2382212,001 lbs. to 16,000 lbs.F3422316,001 lbs. to 26,000 lbs.H5902426,001 lbs. to 28,000 lbs.J7302528,001 lbs. to 32,000 lbs.K942  HB5118 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b132,001 lbs. to 36,000 lbs.L1,082236,001 lbs. to 40,000 lbs.N1,302340,001 lbs. to 45,000 lbs.P1,490445,001 lbs. to 50,000 lbs.Q1,638550,001 lbs. to 54,999 lbs.R1,798655,000 lbs. to 59,500 lbs.S1,930759,501 lbs. to 64,000 lbs.T2,070864,001 lbs. to 73,280 lbs.V2,394973,281 lbs. to 77,000 lbs.X2,7221077,001 lbs. to 80,000 lbs.Z2,89011    Beginning with the 2010 registration year a $1 surcharge 12shall be collected for vehicles registered in the 8,000 lbs. 13and less flat weight plate category above to be deposited into 14the State Police Vehicle Fund. 15    Beginning with the 2014 registration year, a $2 surcharge 16shall be collected in addition to the above fees for vehicles 17registered in the 8,000 lb. and less flat weight plate 18category as described in this subsection (a) to be deposited 19into the Park and Conservation Fund for the Department of 20Natural Resources to use as provided for in Section 805-420 of 21the Department of Natural Resources (Conservation) Law of the 22Civil Administrative Code of Illinois for conservation 23efforts. The monies deposited into the Park and Conservation 24Fund under this Section shall not be subject to administrative 25charges or chargebacks unless otherwise authorized by this 26Act.  HB5118 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1    Of the fees collected under this subsection, $1 of the 2fees shall be deposited into the Secretary of State Special 3Services Fund and $99 of the fees shall be deposited into the 4Road Fund.5    All of the proceeds of the additional fees imposed by 6Public Act 96-34 shall be deposited into the Capital Projects 7Fund. 8    (a-1) A Special Hauling Vehicle is a vehicle or 9combination of vehicles of the second division registered 10under Section 3-813 transporting asphalt or concrete in the 11plastic state or a vehicle or combination of vehicles that are 12subject to the gross weight limitations in subsection (a) of 13Section 15-111 for which the owner of the vehicle or 14combination of vehicles has elected to pay, in addition to the 15registration fee in subsection (a), $125 to the Secretary of 16State for each registration year. The Secretary shall 17designate this class of vehicle as a Special Hauling Vehicle.18    (a-5) Beginning January 1, 2015, upon the request of the 19vehicle owner, a $10 surcharge shall be collected in addition 20to the above fees for vehicles in the 12,000 lbs. and less flat 21weight plate categories as described in subsection (a) to be 22deposited into the Secretary of State Special License Plate 23Fund. The $10 surcharge is to identify vehicles in the 12,000 24lbs. and less flat weight plate categories as a covered farm 25vehicle. The $10 surcharge is an annual, flat fee that shall be 26based on an applicant's new or existing registration year for   HB5118 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1each vehicle in the 12,000 lbs. and less flat weight plate 2categories. A designation as a covered farm vehicle under this 3subsection (a-5) shall not alter a vehicle's registration as a 4registration in the 12,000 lbs. or less flat weight category. 5The Secretary shall adopt any rules necessary to implement 6this subsection (a-5). 7    (a-10) Beginning January 1, 2019, upon the request of the 8vehicle owner, the Secretary of State shall collect a $10 9surcharge in addition to the fees for second division vehicles 10in the 8,000 lbs. and less flat weight plate category 11described in subsection (a) that are issued a registration 12plate under Article VI of this Chapter. The $10 surcharge 13shall be deposited into the Secretary of State Special License 14Plate Fund. The $10 surcharge is to identify a vehicle in the 158,000 lbs. and less flat weight plate category as a covered 16farm vehicle. The $10 surcharge is an annual, flat fee that 17shall be based on an applicant's new or existing registration 18year for each vehicle in the 8,000 lbs. and less flat weight 19plate category. A designation as a covered farm vehicle under 20this subsection (a-10) shall not alter a vehicle's 21registration in the 8,000 lbs. or less flat weight category. 22The Secretary shall adopt any rules necessary to implement 23this subsection (a-10).24    (b) Except as provided in Section 3-806.3, every camping 25trailer, motor home, mini motor home, travel trailer, truck 26camper or van camper used primarily for recreational purposes,   HB5118 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1and not used commercially, nor for hire, nor owned by a 2commercial business, may be registered for each registration 3year upon the filing of a proper application and the payment of 4a registration fee and highway use tax, according to the 5following table of fees:6MOTOR HOME, MINI MOTOR HOME, TRUCK CAMPER OR VAN CAMPER7Gross Weight in Lbs.Total Fees8Including Vehicle andEach9Maximum LoadCalendar Year108,000 lbs and less$78118,001 Lbs. to 10,000 Lbs901210,001 Lbs. and Over10213CAMPING TRAILER OR TRAVEL TRAILER14Gross Weight in Lbs.Total Fees15Including Vehicle andEach16Maximum LoadCalendar Year173,000 Lbs. and Less$18183,001 Lbs. to 8,000 Lbs.30198,001 Lbs. to 10,000 Lbs.382010,001 Lbs. and Over5021    Every house trailer must be registered under Section 223-819. 23    (c) Farm Truck. Any truck used exclusively for the owner's 24own agricultural, horticultural or livestock raising 25operations and not-for-hire only, or any truck used only in 26the transportation for-hire of seasonal, fresh, perishable   HB5118 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1fruit or vegetables from farm to the point of first 2processing, may be registered by the owner under this 3paragraph in lieu of registration under paragraph (a), upon 4filing of a proper application and the payment of the $10 5registration fee and the highway use tax herein specified as 6follows:7SCHEDULE OF FEES AND TAXES8Gross Weight in Lbs.Total Amount for9Including Truck andeach10Maximum LoadClassFiscal Year1116,000 lbs. or lessVF$2501216,001 to 20,000 lbs.VG3261320,001 to 24,000 lbs.VH3901424,001 to 28,000 lbs.VJ4781528,001 to 32,000 lbs.VK6061632,001 to 36,000 lbs.VL7101736,001 to 45,000 lbs.VP9101845,001 to 54,999 lbs.VR1,1261955,000 to 64,000 lbs.VT1,3022064,001 to 73,280 lbs.VV1,3902173,281 to 77,000 lbs.VX1,4502277,001 to 80,000 lbs.VZ1,59023    Of the fees collected under this subsection, $1 of the 24fees shall be deposited into the Secretary of State Special 25Services Fund and $99 of the fees shall be deposited into the 26Road Fund.   HB5118 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 19487 BDA 32935 b1    In the event the Secretary of State revokes a farm truck 2registration as authorized by law, the owner shall pay the 3flat weight tax due hereunder before operating such truck.4    Any combination of vehicles having 5 axles, with a 5distance of 42 feet or less between extreme axles, that are 6subject to the weight limitations in subsection (a) of Section 715-111 for which the owner of the combination of vehicles has 8elected to pay, in addition to the registration fee in 9subsection (c), $125 to the Secretary of State for each 10registration year shall be designated by the Secretary as a 11Special Hauling Vehicle.12    (d) The number of axles necessary to carry the maximum 13load provided shall be determined from Chapter 15 of this 14Code.15    (e) An owner may only apply for and receive 5 farm truck 16registrations, and only 2 of those 5 vehicles shall exceed 1759,500 gross weight in pounds per vehicle.18    (f) Every person convicted of violating this Section by 19failure to pay the appropriate flat weight tax to the 20Secretary of State as set forth in the above tables shall be 21punished as provided for in Section 3-401.22(Source: P.A. 100-734, eff. 1-1-19; 100-956, eff. 1-1-19; 23101-32, eff. 6-28-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.)